apertium-kir.kir.lexc
! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be pure overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы
LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# улуттук

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# улуттук тамак


LEXICON A5                 ! adjectives with comparative reading only;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.comp> 
                           !# кеңири

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# кеңири
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{A%}к PRED ;            !# продукция үчүн кеңирирээк рыноктор ачылат
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}к PRED ;                 ! Dir/LR

%<adj%>%<sup%>%[%+red%]: PRED ;

LEXICON A6                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without comparative reading,
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<adj%>: PRED ;                                       !# example 1
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# example 2
%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# example 3



LEXICON CLIT

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON SUBST

SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADJ-COMMON

%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
! %<n%>: POSSESSION ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;
! %<n%>: N-INFL ;  ! all adjectives can be used as nouns

LEXICON DAGI

!!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of CASES
!%<n%>: CASES ;
!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of N-INFL
!!%<n%>: N-INFL ;
!%<adj%>%<pst%>: # ;
!# ;

!%<attr%>: # ;
!!%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;
!!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;  ! This is instead of the line below
!%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;  ! Use/Circ  !! FIXME: when we go recursie, uncomment

%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;  ! Use/Circ  !! FIXME: when we go recursie, uncomment
%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CASES ;
%<loc%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON V-ADJ

! ADJ-COMMON ; 
! %<pst%>:  # ; 
! # ;
ATTR ; 
%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ATTR

# ;
V-CLIT ;
!ADJ-LEVELS ; ! In theory, there can be <pst> and <comp> readings, but depends what for

LEXICON ADJ

ADJ-COMMON ; 
%<adj%>: ADJ-LEVELS ; 
%<adj%>%<advl%>: ADVL ;
%<adj%>: V-PERS-COP ;

! LEXICON ADJ-ORD
! 
! %<adj%>%<ord%>: # ;
! %<adj%>%<ord%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;
! 
! LEXICON ADJ-KI
!
! %<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ADJ-COMMON ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} ATTR ;
%<subst%>:%>%{K%}%{I%} SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-KI

%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON IRREGULAR-KI

%<adv%>%<attr%>: ATTR ;
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;
ADV-ABL ; 

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
ADV-KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL

ADV ;
ADV-ABL ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-ABL-REG

ADV ;
ADV-ABL-REG ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI

ADV-ABL ;           ! Dir/LR
ADV-WITH-ABL-REG ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>т%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADV-ABL-REG

%<adv%>%<abl%>:%>д%{A%}н PRED ;

LEXICON ADVL

# ;
V-CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: ADVL ;

LEXICON ADVITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: V-CLIT ; 

LEXICON POST-DECL

%<post%>: POSSESSION ; 
%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM-L

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-PL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GEN-POS ; ! was CASES-ETC
%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бул PRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мунун CLIT-NONPRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:муну CLITICS-NO-COP ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:буга CLIT-NONPRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мында PRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мындан PRED ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мындай CASES ;  
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мындайлар CASES ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:мынча CLITICS-NO-COP ;         !

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:мындай PRED ;  

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:мын DAGI ;
бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:му NIKI ;

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:муну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

бул%<prn%>%<dem%>:бу PRON-DEM-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-L

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:н%{I%}н CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:н%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:г%{A%} CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нд%{A%} PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нд%{A%}н PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:нд%{A%}й CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:нд%{A%}й PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>: NIKI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:нд%{I%}кт%{A%}н PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н%{I%} POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-PL ;


!LEXICON PRON-DEM-OSOL
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нун CLIT-NONPRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ну CLIT-NONPRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:го CLIT-NONPRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндо PRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндон PRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндой CASES ;
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:ндой PRED ;
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндуктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>:ну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
!
!LEXICON PRON-DEM-USUL
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;  ! Dir/LR
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нун CLIT-NONPRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ну CLIT-NONPRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га CLIT-NONPRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай CASES ;
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:ндай SUBST-COMMON ;
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндуктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>:ну POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;
!
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-AL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нын CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ндан PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:ндай PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>: NIKI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<reason%>%<abl%>:ндыктан PRED ;  ! FIXME: need better name

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ны POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-PL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-TIGIL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: PRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нин CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ни CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:ге CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нде PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нден PRED ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндей CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:ндей PRED ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:н DAGI ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>: NIKI ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>:ни POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>: PRON-DEM-PL ;

! LEXICON PRON-DEM-MINA

! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:мына PRED ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мунун PRED ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:муну PRED ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:буга PRED ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мында PRED ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мындан PRED ;
! %<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мындай PRED ; ! "FIXME how this should be done?"


LEXICON PRON-PERS-EN

%<nom%>:ен PRED ;
%<gen%>:енин CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<acc%>:ени CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:ага CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<dat%>:аңа CLIT-NONPRED ;   ! Dir/LR
%<dat%>:аа CLIT-NONPRED ;    ! Dir/LR
%<loc%>:енде PRED ;
%<abl%>:енден PRED ;
%<sim%>:ендей PRED ;
:ен DAGI ;
:е NIKI ;

LEXICON Conjunctions 
дагы:дагы CC ; ! "too"
менен:менен CC ; ! "and" / "including" ! Use/MT
бирок:бирок CC ; ! "but"
эгер CS ; ! conjunction like word "if"
эгерде CS ; ! conjunction like word "if"
жана:жана CA ; ! Dir/RL "but"  ! Eh?? 
болуп:болуп CS ; ! Dir/RL ""    ! Huh?
га:га CA ;
деп CS ; ! Use/MT
ошондуктан:ошондуктан CA ;
тактап% айтканда:тактап% айтканда CA ;
ошентсе% да CC ;
ошондой:ошондой CA ;
ошондо% да:ошондо% да CA ;
LEXICON Postpositions
үчүн:үчүн POST-DECL ; ! "for" +nom
чакты:чакты POST ; ! "about, around"
боюнда:боюнда POST ;
улам:улам POST ;
сыяктуу:сыяктуу POST-DECL ;
чамасында:чамасында POST ;
LEXICON Determiners
бул:бул DET-DEM-L ; ! "this"
ошол:ошол DET-DEM-L ; ! "that"
ошол:ошо DET-DEM ; ! "that" ! Dir/LR
ушул:ушул DET-DEM-L ; ! "this (visible)"
ал:ал DET-DEM ; ! "that"
тиги:тигил DET-DEM-L ; ! "that (yonder)" ! Dir/LR
кай:кай DET-DEM ; ! "which"
мына% бу:мына% бу DET-DEM ; ! ""
ушундай:ушундай DET-IND ; ! "this kind of"
эчбир:эчбир DET-IND ; ! "no"
каалаган:каалаган DET-IND ; ! "any"
бүткүл:бүткүл DET-QNT ; ! "whole/all?" 
көп:көп DET-QNT ; ! "a lot of"
кандайдыр% бир:кандайдыр% бир DET-IND ; ! "some kind of"
бардык:бардык DET-QNT ;
жүздөгөн:жүздөгөн DET-QNT ;
өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"
LEXICON Pronouns
мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-PERS-EN ; 
мен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<advl%>:меникиче CLIT ; ! Dir/LR - different meaning than менимче!!
сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:с PRON-PERS-EN ; 
сен%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<advl%>:сеникиче CLIT ;
ал%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<advl%>:аныкыча CLIT ; 
биз%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<advl%>:бизче CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
сиздер%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>%<advl%>:сиздерче CLIT ; 
PRON-DEM-BUL ; ! "this" 
ошол:ошо PRON-DEM-L ; ! "that"
ушул:ушу PRON-DEM-L ; ! "this"
ал:а PRON-DEM-AL ; ! "that"
тигил:тиги PRON-DEM-TIGIL ; ! "that (yonder)
LEXICON Adjectives
геометриялык:геометриялык A4 ; ! "" 
катардуу:катардуу A4 ; ! "" 
мемориалдык:мемориалдык A4 ; ! "" 
практикалык:практикалык A4 ; ! "" 
хаки:хаки A4 ; ! "" 
убактылуу:убактылуу A6 ; ! "for the time" 
системалуу:системалуу A5 ; ! "" ! "comp form used very few" 
ишеничтүү:ишеничтүү A5 ; ! "" 
бас:бас A5 ; ! "" 
ным:ным A5 ; ! "FIXME check this" 
узунча:узунча A5 ; ! "" 
жашыруун:жашыруун A6 ; ! "secret; secretly (seems to be used adverbially, might also be comparable, see 2 examples provided by google" 
мол:мол A6 ; ! "plentiful" ! A6 not A5 because no comparative forms, but advl and occasional subst uses 
жарты:жарты A6 ; ! "" 
бышкан:бышкан ADJ ;
жол% үстү ADJ ; ! what?
күлкүнүчтүү:күлкүнүчтүү ADJ ;
пайдубал:пайдубал ADJ ;
финансылык:финансылык ADJ ;
купуя:купуя A6 ; ! "secret"
LEXICON Adverbs
эмнеге:неге ADVITG ; ! "why"
качан:качан ADVITG ; ! "when"
кандай:кандай ADVITG ; ! "how"
кандайча:кандайча ADVITG ; ! "howso"
кайда:кайда ADVITG ; ! "where"
кыскача:кыскача ADV ; ! "in short"
көбүнчө:көбүнчө ADV ; 
туруптуруп:туруптуруп ADV ; 
зордоп:зордоп ADV ;
катарынан:катарынан ADV ; ! "" 
бая:бая ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "~former"
келер:келер ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "coming/future"
андан% кийин:андан% кийин ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! ""
былтыр:былтыр ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "last year's"
жол:жол ADV-KI ; ! "-time"
жаңы% эле:жаңы% эле ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "just now" 
эртең% менен:эртең% менен ADV-WITH-KI-ABL ; ! "morning
эртең% менен:эртең% менен ADV-ABL-REG ; ! "morning      ! Dir/LR
ары:ар ADV-KI ; ! "further away"
нары:нары ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ; ! "further away"
бери:бери ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ; ! "nearer"
бери:бер ADV-KI ; ! "nearer"
жогору:жогору ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ; ! "high"
акыры:акыры ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ; ! "at last"
акыры:акыр ADV-KI ; ! "previous; last"
илгери:илгер ADV-ABL ; ! "ancient"
эми:эми ADV-WITH-ABL ;
эми:эм ADV-KI ; ! "next/soon-to-be"
эми:эмди ADV-WITH-KI ; ! dialectal form    ! Dir/LR
эми:эмди ADV-ABL-REG ; ! dialectal form    ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кече ADV-WITH-IRREGULAR-KI ;  ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кечээ%>ги IRREGULAR-KI ;
кечээ:кече%>ки IRREGULAR-KI ;       ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кечөө%>кү IRREGULAR-KI ;      ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кечээ%>ки IRREGULAR-KI ;      ! Dir/LR
кечээ:кечөө%>гү IRREGULAR-KI ;      ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Abbreviations
лат:лат ABBR ; !
СВМДА:СВМДА ABBR ; ! "Совещание по взаимодействию и мерам доверия в Азии"
км³:км³ ABBR ; 
РСФСР:РСФСР ABBR ; ! ""
апр:апр ABBR ;
